Mississippi, session 2026, HB687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  No privilege tax or registration fee shall be imposed upon, and no license tag shall be required or issued for, any boat trailer. SECTION 2.  Section 27-19-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-3.  (a)  The following words and phrases when used in this article for the purpose of this article have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in this section, except in those instances where the context clearly describes and indicates a different meaning: (1) "Vehicle" means every device in, upon or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway, except devices moved by muscular power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks. (2)  "Commercial vehicle" means every vehicle used or operated upon the public roads, highways or bridges in connection with any business function. (3)  "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle as defined in this section which is self-propelled, including trackless street or trolley cars.  The term "motor vehicle" shall not include electric bicycles, personal delivery devices or electric personal assistive mobility devices as defined in Section 63-3-103, or golf carts or low-speed vehicles as defined in Section 63-32-1. (4) "Tractor" means every vehicle designed, constructed or used for drawing other vehicles. (5) "Motorcycle" means every vehicle designed to travel on not more than three (3) wheels in contact with the ground, except electric bicycles, personal delivery devices and vehicles included within the term "tractor" as herein classified and defined. (6)  "Truck tractor" means every motor vehicle designed and used for drawing other vehicles and so constructed as to carry a load other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and load so drawn and has a gross vehicle weight (GVW) in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds. (7) "Trailer" means every vehicle without motive power, designed to carry property or passengers wholly on its structure and which is drawn by a motor vehicle. (8) "Semitrailer" means every vehicle (of the trailer type) so designed and used in conjunction with a truck tractor. (9)  "Foreign vehicle" means every motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer, which shall be brought into the state otherwise than by or through a manufacturer or dealer for resale and which has not been registered in this state. (10)  "Pneumatic tires" means all tires inflated with compressed air. (11)  "Solid rubber tires" means every tire made of rubber other than pneumatic tires. (12)  "Solid tires" means all tires, the surface of which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other hard, nonresilient material. (13) "Person" means every natural person, firm, copartnership, corporation, joint-stock or other association or organization. (14)  "Owner" means a person who holds the legal title of a vehicle or in the event a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale, lease or transfer of the possession, the person with the right of purchase upon performance of conditions stated in the agreement, and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee, lessee, possessor or in the event such or similar transaction is had by means of a mortgage, and the mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then such conditional vendee, lessee, possessor or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner for the purposes of this article. (15)  "School bus" means every motor vehicle engaged solely in transporting school children or school children and teachers to and from schools; however, such vehicles may transport passengers on weekends and legal holidays and during summer months between the terms of school for compensation when the transportation of passengers is over a route of which not more than fifty percent (50%) traverses the route of a common carrier of passengers by motor vehicle and when no passengers are picked up on the route of any such carrier. (16) "Dealer" means every person engaged regularly in the business of buying, selling or exchanging motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers, trucks, tractors or other character of commercial or industrial motor vehicles in this state, and having an established place of business in this state. (17)  "Highway" means and includes every way or place of whatever nature, including public roads, streets and alleys of this state generally open to the use of the public or to be opened or reopened to the use of the public for the purpose of vehicular travel, and notwithstanding that the same may be temporarily closed for the purpose of construction, reconstruction, maintenance or repair. (18)  "State Tax Commission," "commission" or "department" means the Commissioner of Revenue of the Department of Revenue of this state, acting directly or through his duly authorized officers, agents, representatives and employees. (19)  "Common carrier by motor vehicle" means any person who or which undertakes, whether directly or by a lease or any other arrangement, to transport passengers or property or any class or classes of property for the general public in interstate or intrastate commerce on the public highways of this state by motor vehicles for compensation, whether over regular or irregular routes.  The term "common carrier by motor vehicle" shall not include passenger buses operating within the corporate limits of a municipality in this state or not exceeding five (5) miles beyond the corporate limits of the municipality, and hearses, ambulances, and school buses as such.  In addition, this definition shall not include taxicabs. (20)  "Contract carrier by motor vehicle" means any person who or which under the special and individual contract or agreements, and whether directly or by a lease or any other arrangement, transports passengers or property in interstate or intrastate commerce on the public highways of this state by motor vehicle for compensation.  The term "contract carrier by motor vehicle" shall not include passenger buses operating wholly within the corporate limits of a municipality in this state or not exceeding five (5) miles beyond the corporate limits of the municipality, and hearses, ambulances, and school buses as such. In addition, this definition shall not include taxicabs. (21)  "Private commercial and noncommercial carrier of property by motor vehicle" means any person not included in the terms "common carrier by motor vehicle" or "contract carrier by motor vehicle," who or which transports in interstate or intrastate commerce on the public highways of this state by motor vehicle, property of which such person is the owner, lessee, or bailee, other than for hire.  The term "private commercial and noncommercial carrier of private property by motor vehicle" shall not include passenger buses operated wholly within the corporate limits of a municipality of this state, or not exceeding five (5) miles beyond the corporate limits of the municipality, and hearses, ambulances, and school buses as such.  In addition, this definition shall not include taxicabs. Haulers of fertilizer shall be classified as private commercial carriers of property by motor vehicle. (22)  "Private carrier of passengers" means all other passenger motor vehicle carriers not included in the above definitions.  The term "private carrier of passengers" shall not include passenger buses operating wholly within the corporate limits of a municipality in this state, or not exceeding five (5) miles beyond the corporate limits of the municipality, and hearses, ambulances, and school buses as such.  In addition, this definition shall not include taxicabs. (23) "Operator" means any person, partnership, joint-stock company or corporation operating on the public highways of the state one or more motor vehicles as the beneficial owner or lessee. (24) "Driver" means the person actually driving or operating such motor vehicle at any given time. (25)  "Private carrier of property" means any person transporting property on the highways of this state as defined below: (i)  Any person, or any employee of such person, transporting farm products, farm supplies, materials and/or equipment used in the growing or production of his own agricultural products in his own truck. (ii)  Any person transporting his own fish, including shellfish, in his own truck. (iii)  Any person, or any employee of such person, transporting unprocessed forest products, or timber harvesting equipment wherein ownership remains the same, in his own truck. (26) "Taxicab" means any passenger motor vehicle for hire with a seating capacity not greater than ten (10) passengers.  For purposes of this paragraph (26), seating capacity shall be determined according to the manufacturer's suggested seating capacity for a vehicle.  If there is no manufacturer's suggested seating capacity for a vehicle, the seating capacity for the vehicle shall be determined according to regulations established by the Department of Revenue. (27)  "Passenger coach" means any passenger motor vehicle with a seating capacity greater than ten (10) passengers, operating wholly within the corporate limits of a municipality of this state or within five (5) miles of the corporate limits of the municipality, or motor vehicles substituted for abandoned electric railway systems in or between municipalities.  For purposes of this paragraph (27), seating capacity shall be determined according to the manufacturer's suggested seating capacity for a vehicle.  If there is no manufacturer's suggested seating capacity for a vehicle, the seating capacity for the vehicle shall be determined according to regulations established by the Department of Revenue. (28)  "Empty weight" means the actual weight of a vehicle including fixtures and equipment necessary for the transportation of load hauled or to be hauled. (29)  "Gross weight" means the empty weight of the vehicle, as defined herein, plus any load being transported or to be transported. (30)  "Ambulance and hearse" shall have the meaning generally ascribed to them.  A hearse or funeral coach shall be classified as a light carrier of property, as defined in Section 27-51-101. (31)  "Regular seats" means each seat ordinarily and customarily used by one (1) passenger, including all temporary, emergency, and collapsible seats.  Where any seats are not distinguished or separated by separate cushions and backs, a seat shall be counted for each eighteen (18) inches of space on such seats or major fraction thereof.  In the case of a regular passenger-type automobile which is used as a common or contract carrier of passengers, three (3) seats shall be counted for the rear seat of such automobile and one (1) seat shall be counted for the front seat of such automobile. (32)  "Ton" means two thousand (2,000) pounds avoirdupois. (33)  "Bus" means any passenger vehicle with a seating capacity of more than ten (10) but shall not include "private carrier of passengers" and "school bus" as defined in paragraphs (15) and (22) of this section.  For purposes of this paragraph (33), seating capacity shall be determined according to the manufacturer's suggested seating capacity for a vehicle.  If there is no manufacturer's suggested seating capacity for a vehicle, the seating capacity for the vehicle shall be determined according to regulations established by the Department of Revenue. (34)  "Corporate fleet" means a group of two hundred (200) or more marked private carriers of passengers or light carriers of property, as defined in Section 27-51-101, trailers, semitrailers, or motor vehicles in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds gross vehicle weight, except for those vehicles registered for interstate travel, owned or leased on a long-term basis by a corporation or other legal entity.  In order to be considered marked, the motor vehicle must have a name, trademark or logo located either on the sides or the rear of the vehicle in sharp contrast to the background, and of a size, shape and color that is legible during daylight hours from a distance of fifty (50) feet. (35)  "Individual fleet" means a group of five (5) or more private carriers of passengers or light carriers of property, as defined in Section 27-51-101, owned or leased by the same person and principally garaged in the same county. (36)  "Trailer fleet" means a group of fifty (50) or more utility trailers each with a gross vehicle weight of six thousand (6,000) pounds or less. (37)  "Rental fleet" means a group of two hundred (200) or more private carriers of passengers or light carriers of property, as defined in Section 27-51-101, trailers, semitrailers, or motor vehicles in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds gross vehicle weight, except for those vehicles registered for interstate travel, owned or leased on a long-term basis by a corporation or other legal entity and exempt from ad valorem taxation under Section 27-51-41(2)(n). (38)  "Boat trailer" means a trailer designed with cradle-type mountings to transport a boat and configured to permit launching of the boat from the rear of the trailer. (b)  (1)  No lease shall be recognized under the provisions of this article unless it shall be in writing and shall fully define a bona fide relationship of lessor and lessee, signed by both parties, dated and be in the possession of the driver of the leased vehicle at all times. (2)  Leased vehicles shall be considered as domiciled at the place in the State of Mississippi from which they operate in interstate or intrastate commerce, and for the purposes of this article shall be considered as owned by the lessee, who shall furnish all insurance on the vehicles and the driver of the vehicles shall be considered as an agent of the lessee for all purposes of this article. SECTION 3.  Section 27-19-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-19-17.  (1)  In all cases where a trailer or semitrailer is used for the transportation of property, either as a common carrier, contract carrier, private commercial carrier, private carrier, or otherwise, and is operated in conjunction with, and is drawn by a tractor, or other motor vehicle, the tax upon such motor vehicle, truck tractor or road tractor shall be calculated and levied on the maximum gross weight of such vehicle, and the tax to be levied upon the operator thereof upon each motor vehicle, truck tractor or road tractor drawing a semitrailer or trailer shall be computed in accordance with the foregoing schedules in the proper classification.  In such cases, however, the gross weight of the trailer or semitrailer shall be combined with the gross weight of the truck tractor, road tractor or other motor vehicle, and the total gross weight of both vehicles counted as one (1) unit shall be used in determining the tax to be paid under this article.  Provided, however, that no tax shall be levied upon any trailer or any farm tractor using the highways solely in hauling or transporting farm products of the soil from the farm to the gin or market, or transporting fertilizer or feed to the farm, where the gross weight does not exceed eight thousand (8,000) pounds, and where the title to such products is still in the producer thereof. (2)  On each trailer, semitrailer, house trailer, house semitrailer, travel trailer, rental trailer or rental semitrailer used with or drawn by any motor vehicle upon the highways of this state there is hereby levied an annual highway privilege tax of Ten Dollars ($10.00).  The highway privilege tax levied in this subsection shall not apply to trailers or semitrailers subject to the tax levied in Section 27-19-18. (3)  Before issuing a license for any trailer or semitrailer, the owner thereof shall furnish the commission a serial number for such trailer or semitrailer, and if the same does not bear a serial number, then the commission shall assign to the owner a serial number, to be placed on such trailer or semitrailer.  Said serial number shall be stamped or printed on such trailer or semitrailer at some convenient and accessible location and shall be used in making application for and issuing the privilege license for such trailer or semitrailer. (4)  No tax shall be imposed on the wagons or trailers, or the tractors drawing same, of circuses, carnivals, fairs and other shows using municipal streets or public highways, when such wagons or trailers are shipped into the State of Mississippi by railroad, and use such streets and highways only in transporting such trailers, or wagons from the railroad to be placed where such circus, carnival, fair or other show is to be held or staged, and in returning such trailers and wagons from such place to the railroad for reloading. SECTION 4.  Section 27-19-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-19-19.  The privilege tax on trailers or semitrailers, to be used with and drawn by private carriers of passengers, on house trailers and on rental trailers shall be collected, and the license tags and decals issued therefor, by the tax collectors of the various counties of the state; provided, however, that decals shall not be required to be issued by the tax collectors for rental trailers. SECTION 5.  Section 27-19-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-19-33.  A license tag and up to two (2) decals of the same size and similar design as prescribed in Section 27-19-31 shall be issued for all trailers and semitrailers except rental trailers registered under the provisions of this article except that the license tag shall bear the word "TRAILER" in addition to the other information.  The owners of all such trailers shall attach such tags and decals in a conspicuous position on the rear of each trailer under the rear light so that it will be visible at night at a distance of sixty (60) feet.  This section shall not apply to trailers and semitrailers subject to the tax levied in Section 27-19-18. SECTION 6.  Section 27-51-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-51-5.  The subject words and terms of this section, for the purpose of this chapter, shall have meanings as follows: (a)  "Motor vehicle" means any device and attachments supported by one or more wheels which is propelled or drawn by any power other than muscular power over the highways, streets or alleys of this state.  The term "motor vehicle" shall not include electric bicycles, personal delivery devices or electric personal assistive mobility devices as defined in Section 63-3-103, or golf carts or low-speed vehicles as defined in Section 63-32-1.  However, mobile homes which are detached from any self-propelled vehicles and parked on land in the state are hereby expressly exempt from the motor vehicle ad valorem taxes, but house trailers which are actually in transit and which are not parked for more than an overnight stop are not exempted. (b)  "Public highway" means and includes every way or place of whatever nature, including public roads, streets and alleys of this state generally open to the use of the public or to be opened or reopened to the use of the public for the purpose of vehicular travel, notwithstanding that the same may be temporarily closed for the purpose of construction, reconstruction, maintenance, or repair. (c) "Administrator of the road and bridge privilege tax law" means the official authorized by law to administer the road and bridge privilege tax law of this state. SECTION 7.  Section 27-51-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-51-7.  Any person required by law to pay a road and bridge privilege license tax on any motor vehicle shall also be liable for the ad valorem taxes due on such motor vehicle, unless otherwise specifically exempt herein. Such ad valorem taxes due shall be paid at the same time the road and bridge privilege license tax is paid, and the payment of the said ad valorem taxes due shall be a prerequisite to the issuance of the said road and bridge privilege license. The ad valorem tax lien date for the purpose of this chapter shall also constitute the ad valorem tax due date which shall also be the same date that the subject motor vehicle is purchased from a bona fide dealer, if it is intended that such motor vehicle is to be operated upon the highways of this state. In all cases, however, where the time for complying with the road and bridge privilege tax law has been extended by law as to time of payment, then the same extension of time shall apply to the date on which the ad valorem taxes on such motor vehicle must be paid. Ad valorem taxes on all motor vehicles, defined in this chapter, shall be calculated as of the first day of the month in which such taxes were due, regardless of any extension of time for payment of such taxes as provided hereinabove. SECTION 8.  Section 27-51-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-51-41.  (1)  The exemptions from the provisions of this chapter shall be confined to those persons or property exempted by this chapter or by the provisions of the Constitution of the United States or the State of Mississippi.  No exemption as now provided by any other statute shall be valid as against the tax levied by this chapter. Any subsequent exemption from the tax levied hereunder shall be provided by amendment to this section which shall be inserted in the bill at length. (2)  The following shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation: (a)  All motor vehicles, as defined in this chapter, and including motor-propelled farm implements and vehicles, while in the hands of bona fide dealers as merchandise and which are not being operated upon the highways of this state. (b)  All motor vehicles belonging to the federal government or the State of Mississippi or any agencies or instrumentalities thereof. (c)  All motor vehicles owned by any school district in the state. (d)  All motor vehicles owned by any fire protection district incorporated in accordance with Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 or by any fire protection grading district incorporated in accordance with Sections 19-5-215 through 19-5-241. (e)  All motor vehicles owned by units of the Mississippi National Guard. (f)  All motor vehicles which are exempted from highway privilege taxes under Section 27-19-1 et seq. (g)  All motor vehicles operated in this state as common and contract carriers of property, private commercial carriers of property, private carriers of property and buses, all of which have a gross weight in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds. (h)  Antique automobiles as defined in Section 27-19-47, and antique pickup trucks as provided for under Section 27-19-47.2, Mississippi Code of 1972. (i)  Street rods as defined in Section 27-19-56.6. (j)  (i)  Two (2) motor vehicles owned by a disabled American veteran, or by the spouse of a deceased disabled American veteran, who is entitled to purchase a distinctive license plate or tag in accordance with Section 27-19-53, regardless of the license plate or tag issued to the disabled American veteran or the veteran's spouse if the disabled American veteran is deceased. (ii)  One (1) motorcycle owned by a disabled American veteran, or by the spouse of a deceased disabled American veteran, who is entitled to purchase a distinctive license plate or tag in accordance with Section 27-19-53, regardless of the license plate or tag issued to the disabled American veteran or the veteran's spouse if the disabled American veteran is deceased. (k)  One (1) motor vehicle owned by the unremarried surviving spouse of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States who, while on active duty, is killed or dies and one (1) motor vehicle owned by the unremarried surviving spouse of a member of a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States or of the National Guard who, while on active duty for training, is killed or dies. (l)  Motor vehicles owned by recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor or by former prisoners of war, or by spouses of such deceased persons, in accordance with Section 27-19-54. (m)  (i)  One (1) private carrier of passengers, as defined in Section 27-19-3, owned by any religious society, ecclesiastical body or any congregation thereof which is used exclusively for such society and not for profit. (ii)  All motor vehicles owned by any such religious society or any educational institution having a seating capacity greater than seven (7) passengers and used exclusively for transporting passengers for religious or educational purposes and not for profit. (n)  All motor vehicles primarily used as rentals under rental agreements with a term of not more than thirty (30) continuous days each and under the control of persons who are engaged in the business of renting such motor vehicles and who are subject to the tax under Section 27-65-231. (o)  Antique motorcycles as defined in Section 27-19-47.1. (p)  One (1) motor vehicle owned by a recipient of the Purple Heart, and one (1) motor vehicle owned by the unremarried surviving spouse of a recipient of the Purple Heart, as provided in Section 27-19-56.5. (q)  Motor vehicles that are eligible to display an authentic historical license plate as provided for in Section 27-19-56.11. (r)  Motor vehicles that are (i) designed or adapted to be used exclusively in the preparation and loading of chemicals or other material for aerial agricultural application to crops; and (ii) only incidentally used on public roadways in this state. (s)  One (1) motor vehicle owned by the mother of a service member who died while serving on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States while the United States was engaged in hostile activities or a time of war after September 11, 2001, as provided for in Section 27-19-56.162 or Section 27-19-56.524(5). (t)  One (1) motor vehicle owned by the unremarried spouse of a service member who died while serving on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States while the United States was engaged in hostile activities or a time of war after September 11, 2001, as provided for in Section 27-19-56.162 or Section 27-19-56.524(5). (u)  Buses and other motor vehicles that are (a) owned and operated by an entity that has entered into a contract with a school board under Section 37-41-31 for the purpose of transporting students to and from schools and (b) used by the entity for such transportation purposes.  This paragraph (u) shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2010. (v)  One (1) motor vehicle owned by a recipient of the Silver Star, and one (1) motor vehicle owned by the unremarried surviving spouse of a recipient of the Silver Star, as provided in Section 27-19-56.284. (w)  One (1) motor vehicle owned by a person who is a law enforcement officer and who (i) was wounded or otherwise received intentional or accidental bodily injury, regardless of whether occurring before or after July 1, 2014, while engaged in the performance of his official duties, provided the wound or injury was not self-inflicted, (ii) was required to receive medical treatment for the wound or injury due to the nature and extent of the wound or injury, and (iii) is eligible to receive a special license plate or tag under Section 27-19-56 as a result of such wound or injury, regardless of whether the person obtains such a plate or tag. Application for the exemption provided in this paragraph (w) may be made at the time of initial registration of a vehicle and renewal of registration.  In addition, an applicant for the exemption must provide official written documentation that (i) the applicant is a law enforcement officer who was wounded or otherwise received intentional or accidental bodily injury while engaged in the performance of his official duties and that the wound or injury was not self-inflicted along with official written documentation verifying receipt of medical treatment for the wound or injury and the nature and extent of the wound or injury, and (ii) the applicant is eligible to receive a special license plate or tag under Section 27-19-56 as a result of such wound or injury, regardless of whether the person obtains such a plate or tag. (x)  One (1) motor vehicle owned by an honorably discharged veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States who served during World War II, and one (1) motor vehicle owned by the unremarried surviving spouse of such veteran, as provided in Section 27-19-56.438. (y)  Boat trailers as defined in Section 27-19-3. (3)  Any claim for tax exemption by authority of the above-mentioned code sections or by any other legal authority shall be set out in the application for the road and bridge privilege license, and the specific legal authority for such tax exemption claim shall be cited in said application, and such authority cited shall be shown by the tax collector on the tax receipt as his authority for not collecting such ad valorem taxes, and the tax collector shall carry forward such information in his tax collection reports. (4)  Any motor vehicle driven over the highways of this state to the extent that the owner of such motor vehicle is required to purchase a road and bridge privilege license in this state, yet the legal situs of such motor vehicle is located in another state, shall be exempt from ad valorem taxes authorized by this chapter. (5)  If a taxpayer shall sell, trade or otherwise dispose of a vehicle on which the ad valorem and road and bridge privilege taxes have been paid in any county in the state, he shall remove the license plate from the vehicle.  Such license plate must be surrendered to the issuing authority with the corresponding tax receipt, if required, and credit shall be allowed for the taxes paid for the remaining tax year on like privilege or ad valorem taxes due on another vehicle owned by the seller or transferor or by the seller's or transferor's spouse or dependent child.  If the seller or transferor does not elect to receive such credit at the time the license plate is surrendered, the issuing authority shall issue a certificate of credit to the seller or transferor, or to the seller's or transferor's spouse or dependent child, or to any other person, business or corporation, at the direction of the seller or transferor, for the remaining unexpired taxes prorated from the first day of the month following the month in which the license plate is surrendered.  The total of such credit may be used by the person or entity to whom the certificate of credit is issued, regardless of the relative amounts attributed to privilege taxes or to county, school or municipal ad valorem taxes.  Any credit allowed for taxes due or any certificate of credit issued may be applied to like taxes owed in any county by the person to whom the credit is allowed or by the person possessing the certificate of credit.  No credit, however, shall be allowed on the charge made for the license plate.  Such license plates surrendered to the tax collector shall be retained by him, and in no event shall such license plate be attached to any vehicle after being surrendered to the tax collector, nor shall any license plate be transferred from one (1) vehicle to any other vehicle. (6)  If the person owning a vehicle subject to taxation under the provisions of this chapter does not operate such vehicle on the highways of this state from the date of acquisition or, if previously registered, from the end of the anniversary month of the tag and decals to the date on which he makes application for a current license tag or decals, he shall pay such ad valorem tax for a period of twelve (12) months beginning with the first day of the month in which he applies for a current license tag or decals under Chapter 19, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972. The owner shall submit an affidavit with an application attesting to the fact that the vehicle was not operated on the highways of this state from the date of acquisition or, if previously registered, from the end of the anniversary month of the tag and decals to the date on which he makes application for the current license tag or decals. (7)  Any person found violating any of the provisions of this section shall be arrested and tried, and if found guilty shall be fined in an amount double the total amount of taxes involved. SECTION 9.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified as a new section in Chapter 19, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 10.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.